Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.324

[Art. 34] Advice of state judge advocate and reference for trial.

(1) Before directing the trial of any charge by general court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to the state judge advocate for consideration and advice. The convening authority may not refer a charge to a general court-martial for trial unless he or she has found that the charge alleges an offense under this code, is warranted by evidence indicated in the report of the investigation under RCW 38.38.316, if there is such a report, and the court-martial would have jurisdiction over the accused and the offense.

(2) The advice of the staff judge advocate under subsection (1) of this section with respect to a specification under a charge shall include a written and signed statement by the staff judge advocate:

(a) Expressing conclusions with respect to each matter set forth in subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Recommending action that the convening authority take regarding the specification.

If the specification is referred for trial, the recommendation of the state judge advocate shall accompany the specification.

(3) If the charges or specifications are not formally correct or do not conform to the substance of the evidence contained in the report of the investigating officer, formal corrections, and such changes in the charges and specifications as are needed to make them conform to the evidence may be made.

[ 1989 c 48 s 33; 1963 c 220 s 36.]